Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.010

Certifying primary candidates.

Not later than the Tuesday following the regular filing period, the secretary of state shall certify to each county auditor a list of the candidates who have filed declarations of candidacy in his or her office for the primary. For each office, the certificate shall include the name of each candidate, his or her address, and his or her party preference, if any, provided on filed declarations.

[ 2013 c 11 s 39; 2011 c 349 s 15. Prior: 2005 c 2 s 12 (Initiative Measure No. 872, approved November 2, 2004); 2003 c 111 s 901; prior: 1990 c 59 s 8; 1965 ex.s. c 103 s 4; 1965 c 9 s 29.27.020; prior: 1949 c 161 s 10, part; 1947 c 234 s 2, part; 1935 c 26 s 1, part; 1921 c 178 s 4, part; 1907 c 209 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 5185, part. Formerly RCW 29.27.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Short title—Intent—Contingent effective date—2005 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 872): See notes following RCW 29A.52.112.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.